Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2035YH (2) 91 je/js H.F. 677 Section 1. Section 20.3, subsection 11, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. A correctional officer employed by the 3 Iowa department of corrections. 4 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to collective 5 bargaining procedures pursuant to chapter 20 initiated on or 6 after the effective date of this Act. 7